Maine, session 132, LD192.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §2013, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2019, c. 7, §2, is further
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
"Depreciable machinery and equipment" does not include a motor vehicle as defined
in section 1752, subsection 7 or a trailer as defined in section 1752, subsection 19‑A,
except that, beginning January 1, 2026, "depreciable machinery and equipment"
includes a utility vehicle.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §2013, sub-§1, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. "Utility vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle that is designed with a bed,
principally for the purpose of transporting material or cargo in connection with
construction, agriculture, forestry, grounds maintenance, lawn and garden
maintenance, materials handling or similar activities, and that has an attainable speed
in one mile on a paved, level surface of 20 to 50 miles per hour.
Sec. 3. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.